Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-279
Hearing; witnesses; immunity.

Any person giving evidence by written statement or in person at a hearing requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269 shall be given the same immunity from liability as a person testifying in a court case.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,192;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 83.